District of Columbia statutes.
26-533

Liability of IV-D agency.

The IV-D agency shall disclose a person’s financial records obtained from a financial institution only for the purpose of, and to the extent necessary in, establishing, modifying, or enforcing a support obligation of that person. Unauthorized disclosure may result in the awarding of civil damages pursuant to section 469A(c) of the Social Security Act, approved August 22, 1996 (110 Stat. 2105; 42 U.S.C. § 659A(c) ).

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 204, 48 DCR 1270
Section 201 of D.C. Law 13-207 added this section.
Section 401(b) of D.C. Law 13-207 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 201 of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 13-446, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9213).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 204 of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).